Washington statutes.
RCW 40.07.040

Duties of the governor.

(1) The governor or the governor's designee shall take such other action as may be necessary to maximize the economy, efficiency, and effectiveness of state publications and to do so may eliminate, consolidate, or simplify state agency publications.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in any way as restricting public access to public records or the public right to copy such records as provided by chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2005 c 274 s 276; 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 4.]